Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.460

Electronic wills—Qualified custodians—Eligibility.

(1) The following may serve as a qualified custodian:

(a) Any suitable person over the age of 18 years, who is a resident of the state of Washington at the time the electronic will was signed;

(b) A trust company regularly organized under the laws of this state and national banks when authorized to do so;

(c) A nonprofit corporation, if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of that corporation permit the action and if the corporation is in compliance with all applicable provisions of Title 24 RCW;

(d) Any professional service corporations, professional limited liability companies, or limited liability partnerships, that are duly organized under the laws of this state and whose shareholders, members, or partners, respectively, are exclusively attorneys; and

(e) A will repository in the county in which the testator is domiciled.

(2) The following are disqualified to serve as a qualified custodian:

(a) Minors, persons of unsound mind, or persons who have been convicted of (i) any felony or (ii) any crime involving moral turpitude;

(b) An individual who is an heir, beneficiary, or otherwise has an interest in [the] testator's estate; and

(c) Corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1007.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.